Hawaii statutes.
[§507-71] Other rights. Nothing in
this part shall be construed to impair or affect the right of the parties to
create additional rights, duties, and obligations in and by virtue of the
rental agreement. The rights provided by this part shall be in addition to all
other rights provided by law to a creditor against the creditor's debtor.[L
1984, c 239, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next